Tennessee statutes. Title 37 Juveniles
Part 6

Multi-level Response System for Children and Families

37-5-601. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Family” means the members of a household living, on a full-time or a part-time basis, in one (1) house, condominium, apartment or other dwelling; people related by blood or ancestry, marriage, or adoption; any person who is holding out to the public as being a family member of a minor; foster parents and foster children; stepparents and stepchildren; and any other group that the department determines by policy or rule to constitute a family for purposes of this part; and

“Maltreatment” means abuse as defined in § 37-1-102, or child sexual abuse as defined in § 37-1-602.

Acts 2005, ch. 391, § 2.

Law Reviews.

Differential Response in Child Protection Services: Perpetuating the Illusion of Voluntariness (Soledad A. McGrath), 42 U. Mem. L. Rev. 629 (2012).

37-5-602. Purposes.

The purposes of this part are to safeguard and enhance the welfare of children and to preserve family life, by preventing harm and sexual abuse to children and by strengthening the ability of families to parent their children effectively through a multi-level response system using available community-based public and private services. It is intended that the department perform its function under this part pursuant to the belief that families can change the circumstances associated with the level of risk to a child, when they are provided with intensive and comprehensive services tailored to their strengths and needs. The department's fundamental assumptions shall be that most children are better off with their own families than in substitute care, and that separation has detrimental effects on both parents and children. Whenever possible, preservation of the family should serve as the framework for services, but, in any case, the best interests of the child shall be paramount.

The further purpose of this part is to authorize and require the department to develop a demonstration program to carry out the purposes stated in subsection (a). A specific objective of the demonstration program is to reduce the incidence of children who are subjected to maltreatment. Until the program is in effect statewide, this part shall be in effect only in the areas in which the demonstration program is established.

Acts 2005, ch. 391, § 3.

Law Reviews.

Differential Response in Child Protection Services: Perpetuating the Illusion of Voluntariness (Soledad A. McGrath), 42 U. Mem. L. Rev. 629 (2012).

37-5-603. Establishment of demonstration program — State advisory committee — Reporting.

No later than July 1, 2006, the department shall establish a demonstration program that conforms to the requirements of this part and carries out its purposes in at least three (3) but no more than five (5) areas of the state selected by the department. The multi-level response system shall be designed to protect children from maltreatment, through the effective use of available community-based public and private services. The program should be staffed by case managers and other personnel and child protective services investigators, as called for in this part. There shall be at least one (1) area in each grand division of the state. Areas may be composed of any combination of one (1) or more counties. No later than July 1, 2007, the demonstration program shall be expanded to include a total of no less than ten (10) areas of the state selected by the department. No later than July 1, 2010, the program shall be implemented in all areas of the state.

To facilitate accomplishment of the purposes of this part, the department shall establish a state advisory committee composed of representatives from the offices of the commissioners of correction, education, health, human services, mental health and substance abuse services, and intellectual and developmental disabilities, the commission on children and youth, and any other state or community-based public or private agency or office that the department determines serves children or families in ways that might be used in the demonstration program. The department shall pursue the creation of such interagency agreements permitted by law as will enable the department to accomplish the purposes of this part.

The department shall advise the governor, the judiciary committee of the senate, the committee of the house of representatives having oversight over children and families, and the health and welfare committee of the senate of the progress the department is making toward implementation of the program by providing them with a summary progress report highlighting key implementation activities, including, but not limited to, site selection, timelines, barriers to implementation, identification of needed resources, interagency cooperation, and progress in establishing local advisory committees, on October 1, 2005, and every six (6) months thereafter, until statewide implementation is achieved. After the first year of operation of the program, the department shall include in its report any recommendations for changes in the law, including whether there are any kinds of cases investigated under chapter 1, parts 4 and 6 of this title, that the experience of the department shows can be safely excluded from mandatory investigation under those parts.

Acts 2005, ch. 391, § 4; 2010, ch. 1100, § 64; 2011, ch. 410, § 3(y); 2012, ch. 575, § 2; 2013, ch. 236, § 28; 2019, ch. 345, § 48.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health, the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

For the Preamble to the act concerning the prohibition against establishment of a special committee if there is a standing committee on the same subject, please refer to Acts 2011, ch. 410.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “the committee of the house of representatives having oversight over children and families, and” for “the civil justice committee of the house of representatives and” in (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 345, § 148. May 10, 2019.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

Law Reviews.

Differential Response in Child Protection Services: Perpetuating the Illusion of Voluntariness (Soledad A. McGrath), 42 U. Mem. L. Rev. 629 (2012).

37-5-604. Screening instrument — Assessment — Determination of level of intervention — Investigation of reports of harm or sexual abuse.

Upon receipt of a report of harm pursuant to § 37-1-403, the department shall make an initial screening decision using an approved screening instrument. The screening instrument shall be developed by the department. If the report does not allege that the child has been harmed or that the child has been sexually abused, after reviewing the information available and using the screening instrument, the department shall determine whether the child is at risk of maltreatment. If the child is at risk of maltreatment, the department shall determine whether the appropriate level of intervention is:

Investigation pursuant to chapter 1 of this title;

Assessment of the child and the family's need for and referral to available community-based public or private services;

Referral for available community-based public or private services without assessment or investigation; or

No further action by the department.

If the department receives a report under chapter 1, part 4 or part 6 of this title, that alleges a child has actually been harmed or sexually abused, the department shall investigate such report, with child protective services investigators, to the extent that they are available, pursuant to chapter 1, part 4 or part 6 of this title. The department also may proceed at the same time with assessment under this section.

If the department determines that an assessment of the child and family is appropriate, the department shall give the parents, guardian, or others exercising parental authority, a written and oral explanation of the procedure for assessment of the child and family and its purposes. The assessment of the child and family and identification of service needs shall be based on information gathered from the family and other sources. The department shall have such face-to-face contact with the child, parents, other family members, and other sources, as is necessary to make the assessment reliable. If the parent is not present during contact with a child, the child's parent or guardian shall be contacted as soon as possible following contact with the child. The assessment of the child and family shall be completed within forty-five (45) days of receipt of the report. However, upon written justification by the department, the assessment of the child and family may be extended up to a total of sixty (60) days. The assessment of the child and family shall be in writing and shall be completed in accordance with department policy or regulations.

Upon completion of the assessment of the child and family, the department shall consult with the family about available community-based public or private services to address the family's needs. When appropriate, families shall be offered services through the department, other public agencies, or community-based private agencies, which may include faith-based organizations, to promote meeting the needs of the family. The department may not require a family to participate in available public or private community-based services that it offers the family. If the family does not cooperate with the provision of community-based public or private services or provide alternative services of its own to meet such needs, then the department shall assess whether further steps should be taken to carry out the purposes of this part. If a family that declines services that are offered to them does not provide adequate alternative services of its own, the department shall inform the parents that their actions in declining services may be considered in future action by the department.

If the department determines, under subsection (a), that the appropriate level of intervention is referral for available community-based public or private services without assessment or investigation, then the department may refer the family for preventive community-based public or private services. Families have the option of declining services offered as a result of a report of harm that did not result in an investigation or assessment of the child and family. If the family declines the services, the case shall be closed, unless the local department determines that sufficient cause exists to redetermine the case as one that needs to be investigated or assessed. Any family that declines services offered to them shall be informed that their actions in declining services may be considered in evaluating any future reports of harm received by the department.

The department shall commence an immediate investigation, if, at any time during the provision of services under this part, the department determines that an investigation is required by chapter 1, part 4 or part 6 of this title, and that investigation shall be conducted under those provisions. The district attorney general and law enforcement officials shall be informed of the investigation as required under those provisions.

Acts 2005, ch. 391, § 5; 2011, ch. 410, § 3(z).

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning the prohibition against establishment of a special committee if there is a standing committee on the same subject, please refer to Acts 2011, ch. 410.

Law Reviews.

Differential Response in Child Protection Services: Perpetuating the Illusion of Voluntariness (Soledad A. McGrath), 42 U. Mem. L. Rev. 629 (2012).

37-5-605. Annual report — Collection and maintenance of data.

No later than October 1, 2007, the department shall submit to the governor, the health and welfare committee of the senate, the committee of the house of representatives having oversight over children and families, and the judiciary committee of the senate a report on the first full year of the demonstration program. No later than October 1, 2008, and each year thereafter until this part is implemented in all areas of the state, the department shall provide an annual report evaluating the demonstration project to the same parties. Upon request, all persons and groups to whom the annual report is distributed shall be entitled to receive a detailed explanation of the procedures used to evaluate the system and shall be given the raw data used to support the report. Outcomes to be evaluated in each of these reports shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

The safety of children under the program compared with children served under chapter 1, part 4 or part 6 of this title, in light of the following and other factors that may provide useful information about the effectiveness of the program for its purposes:

The number of cases processed under the program, by types of risks and needs addressed;

The number of cases referred for proceedings under chapter 1 of this title, by type;

The number of final dispositions of cases in the current reporting year by disposition as follows:

Closed on initial review;

Closed after assessment;

Closed after assessment and referral for available community-based public or private services;

Numbers and types of cases in which the department proceeded under chapter 1 of this title, after the initial review; and

Numbers and types of cases in which there were reports of harm or sexual abuse under chapter 1, part 4 or part 6 of this title, with respect to children in a family considered or served under this part;

The extent to which the program has reduced the incidence of children who are subjected to harm or sexual abuse that would require a report under chapter 1, part 4 or part 6 of this title, or who otherwise would become eligible for services under chapter 1 of this title;

To whom reports of harm or sexual abuse were determined to show that there had been no harm or sexual abuse or that those reports were invalid; and

The type and amount of community-based public or private services received by families;

The timeliness of response by the department under the program;

The timeliness of services provided to children and families under the program;

The level of coordination with public and private community-based service providers to ensure community-based services are available to the public through the program;

The cost effectiveness of the program with respect to the department, available community-based public and private service resources, and law enforcement and judiciary resources that might otherwise have become involved in the cases; and

The effectiveness of the program in enhancing the welfare of children and keeping families together.

Upon implementation of the multi-level response system in any area, the department shall ensure that all data necessary for compliance with this section is collected and maintained.

Acts 2005, ch. 391, § 6; 2011, ch. 410, § 3(aa); 2013, ch. 236, § 27; 2019, ch. 345, § 49.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning the prohibition against establishment of a special committee if there is a standing committee on the same subject, please refer to Acts 2011, ch. 410.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “the committee of the house of representatives having oversight over children and families” for “the civil justice committee of the house of representatives” in (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 345, § 148. May 10, 2019.

Law Reviews.

Differential Response in Child Protection Services: Perpetuating the Illusion of Voluntariness (Soledad A. McGrath), 42 U. Mem. L. Rev. 629 (2012).

37-5-606. Training and information.

Before the demonstration program is instituted in an area, the department shall assure that all personnel in the program in that area are thoroughly trained in matters relating to their role in the program, utilizing, to the extent possible, existing training resources for each profession. The training shall include information on the culturally diverse community, including, but not limited to, religious, dietary, and education requirements of families affected by this part. At a minimum, training should be provided to all departmental personnel involved in the demonstration project, including case managers. In addition, the department shall offer training to community-based service providers, attorneys, prosecutors, guardians ad litem, judges, and law enforcement personnel. Informational materials concerning the demonstration program should be prepared for families and their attorneys.

Acts 2005, ch. 391, § 7.

Law Reviews.

Differential Response in Child Protection Services: Perpetuating the Illusion of Voluntariness (Soledad A. McGrath), 42 U. Mem. L. Rev. 629 (2012).

37-5-607. Independent local advisory board.

In each county in which the multi-level response system is implemented, the department shall facilitate the formation of an independent local advisory board, which shall not be a part of the department, and which shall be composed of appropriate community representatives, including representatives from families in the community, local public agencies, including schools, health departments and other health care providers, juvenile court, and law enforcement officials, and other available community-based resources. Each local advisory board shall recommend ways to bring together the department, families, and available resource providers within that community and shall assist with the development of community-based resources that may be needed by families. The local advisory board may review individual cases, in its discretion, to the extent that such review may be done without jeopardizing the confidentiality of the records or the confidentiality obligations of those who provided the information. The department shall collaborate with the local advisory board and the community to identify or develop local formal and informal services for children and families.

Acts 2005, ch. 391, § 8; 2010, ch. 692, § 1.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

Law Reviews.

Differential Response in Child Protection Services: Perpetuating the Illusion of Voluntariness (Soledad A. McGrath), 42 U. Mem. L. Rev. 629 (2012).

37-5-608. Rules and regulations.

The commissioner is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of this part. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2005, ch. 391, § 9.

Law Reviews.

Differential Response in Child Protection Services: Perpetuating the Illusion of Voluntariness (Soledad A. McGrath), 42 U. Mem. L. Rev. 629 (2012).

Chapters 6-9

[Reserved]